tr: Düğme kullanım alanı: Giyim; Bebek ve çocuk giyim; El işi ve dekoratif; Oyuncak bebek yapımı; Triko; Dış giyim ve kaban; Albüm ve kart yapımı; Üniformalar; Döşeme; Düğün ve resmi giyim; Diğer
th: ลักษณะการใช้งานกระดุม: เครื่องแต่งกาย; เครื่องแต่งกายเด็กและทารก; งานฝีมือและตกแต่ง; การทำตุ๊กตา; เสื้อผ้าถัก; เสื้อตัวนอกและเสื้อโค้ท; การทำสมุดภาพและการทำการ์ด; เครื่องแบบ; งานบุเฟอร์นิเจอร์; ชุดแต่งงานและชุดทางการ; อื่นๆ
da: Anvendelse af knapper: Beklædning; Baby- og børnetøj; Hobby og dekoration; Dukkefremstilling; Strikvarer; Overtøj og frakker; Scrapbog og kortfremstilling; Uniformer; Møbelpolstring; Bryllups- og festtøj; Andet
de: Anwendung des Knopfes: Bekleidung; Baby- und Kinderbekleidung; Basteln und Dekoration; Puppenherstellung; Strickwaren; Oberbekleidung und Mäntel; Scrapbooking und Kartengestaltung; Uniformen; Polsterung; Hochzeits- und Abendmode; Sonstige
ro-RO: Aplicație pentru buton: Îmbrăcăminte; Îmbrăcăminte pentru bebeluși și copii; Artizanat și decorațiuni; Confecționare de păpuși; Tricotaje; Îmbrăcăminte de exterior și paltoane; Scrapbooking și confecționare de felicitări; Uniforme; Tapițerie; Ținute de nuntă și de ocazie; Altele
sv: Knappapplicering: Kläder; Baby- och barnkläder; Pyssel och dekoration; Docktillverkning; Stickat; Ytterkläder och kappor; Scrapbooking och korttillverkning; Uniformer; Möbelstoppning; Bröllop och festkläder; Övrigt
nl: Knoop toepassing: Kleding; Baby- en kinderkleding; Knutselen en decoratie; Poppen maken; Breigoed; Bovenkleding en jassen; Scrapbooking en kaarten maken; Uniformen; Meubelstoffering; Bruids- en gelegenheidskleding; Overig
hr-HR: Gumb aplikacija: Odjeća; Odjeća za bebe i djecu; Rukotvorine i ukrasi; Izrada lutaka; Pletenina; Vanjska odjeća i kaputi; Izrada spomenara i čestitki; Uniforme; Tapeciranje; Vjenčana i svečana odjeća; Ostalo
sk-SK: Aplikácia gombíka: Oblečenie; Dojčenské a detské oblečenie; Remeselné a dekoratívne; Výroba bábik; Pleteniny; Vrchné oblečenie a kabáty; Scrapbooking a výroba pohľadníc; Uniformy; Čalúnenie; Svadobné a formálne oblečenie; Iné
el: Εφαρμογή κουμπιού: Ένδυση; Βρεφική και παιδική ένδυση; Χειροτεχνία και διακοσμητικά; Κατασκευή κούκλας; Πλεκτά; Πανωφόρια και παλτό; Scrapbooking και κατασκευή καρτών; Στολές; Ταπετσαρία; Νυφικά και επίσημα ενδύματα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Uporaba gumba: Oblačila; Oblačila za dojenčke in otroke; Rokodelstvo in dekoracija; Izdelava lutk; Pletenine; Vrhnja oblačila in plašči; Izdelava spominskih albumov in voščilnic; Uniforme; Oblazinjenje; Poročna in svečana oblačila; Drugo
pl: Sposób mocowania guzika: Odzież; Odzież niemowlęca i dziecięca; Rękodzieło i dekoracje; Wyrób lalek; Dzianina; Odzież wierzchnia i płaszcze; Scrapbooking i cardmaking; Mundury; Tapicerka; Odzież ślubna i wizytowa; Inne
ja: ボタン用途: アパレル; ベビーおよびキッズアパレル; クラフトおよび装飾; 人形作り; ニットウェア; アウターおよびコート; スクラップブックおよびカード作り; ユニフォーム; 室内装飾; ウェディングおよびフォーマルウェア; その他
pt-PT: Aplicação do botão: Vestuário; Vestuário de bebé e criança; Artesanato e decoração; Fabrico de bonecas; Malhas; Agasalhos e casacos; Scrapbooking e criação de cartões; Uniformes; Estofos; Casamento e roupa formal; Outro
pt-BR: Aplicação do botão: Roupas; Roupas de bebês e crianças; Artesanato e decoração; Confecção de bonecas; Malhas; Agasalhos e casacos; Scrapbook e cartões; Uniformes; Estofamento; Roupas de casamento e trajes formais; Outra
ru: Область применения пуговицы: Одежда; Детская одежда; Рукоделие и декор; Изготовление кукол; Трикотаж; Верхняя одежда и пальто; Скрапбукинг и кардмейкинг; Униформа; Обивка; Свадебная и вечерняя одежда; Другое
zh-CN: 按钮应用: 服装; 婴童服装; 手工艺品与装饰; 玩偶制作; 针织品; 外套与大衣; 剪贴簿与贺卡制作; 制服; 室内装潢; 婚纱与正装; 其他
cs: Způsob uchycení knoflíku: Oděvy; Dětské a kojenecké oděvy; Tvoření a dekorace; Výroba panenek; Pleteniny; Svrchní oděvy a kabáty; Scrapbooking a výroba přání; Uniformy; Čalounictví; Svatební a společenské oděvy; Jiné
lt-LT: Sagos pritaikymas: Drabužiai; Kūdikių ir vaikų drabužiai; Rankdarbiai ir dekoracijos; Lėlių gamyba; Trikotažas; Viršutiniai drabužiai ir paltai; Skrebinimas ir atvirukų gamyba; Uniformos; Baldų apmušalai; Vestuviniai ir proginiai drabužiai; Kita
vi: Ứng dụng nút: Trang phục; Trang phục trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ em; Thủ công và trang trí; Làm búp bê; Đồ len; Trang phục mặc ngoài và áo khoác; Làm sổ lưu niệm và làm thiệp; Đồng phục; Vải bọc; Trang phục cưới và trang trọng; Khác
en: Button application: Apparel; Baby and children's apparel; Craft and decorative; Dollmaking; Knitwear; Outerwear and coats; Scrapbooking and cardmaking; Uniforms; Upholstery; Wedding and formalwear; Other
fi: Napin kiinnitys: Vaatteet; Vauvojen ja lasten vaatteet; Askartelu ja koristelu; Nukenvalmistus; Neuleet; Päällysvaatteet ja takit; Skräppäys ja korttien askartelu; Univormut; Verhoilu; Hää- ja juhlavaatteet; Muu
it: app di prenotazione: Abbigliamento; Abbigliamento per neonati e bambini; Artigianato e decorazione; Creazione di bambole; Maglieria; Capispalla e cappotti; Scrapbooking e creazione di biglietti; Uniformi; Tappezzeria; Abiti da sposa e da cerimonia; Altro
ko: 단추 부착: 의류; 유아 및 아동 의류; 공예 및 장식; 인형 제작; 니트웨어; 아우터 및 코트; 스크랩북 및 카드 제작; 유니폼; 실내 장식재; 웨딩 및 정장; 기타
bg-BG: Приложение на копчето: Облекло; Бебешко и детско облекло; Занаятчийски и декоративни; Изработка на кукли; Плетива; Връхни дрехи и палта; Скрапбукинг и изработка на картички; Униформи; Тапицерия; Сватбено и официално облекло; Други
es: Aplicación del botón: Ropa; Ropa para bebés y niños; Manualidades y decoración; Fabricación de muñecas; Prendas de punto; Abrigos y ropa exterior; Scrapbook y tarjetería; Uniformes; Tapicería; Ropa formal y de boda; Otro
nb: Knappebruk: Klær; Baby- og barneklær; Håndarbeid og dekor; Dukkemaking; Strikkeplagg; Yttertøy og jakker; Scrapbooking og kortlaging; Uniformer; Møbeltrekk; Bryllups- og selskapsantrekk; Annet
hu: Gomb alkalmazás: Ruházat; Baba- és gyermekruházat; Kézműves és dekorációs; Babakészítés; Kötöttáru; Felsőruházat és kabátok; Scrapbook és kártyakészítés; Egyenruhák; Kárpit; Esküvői és alkalmi ruházat; Egyéb
fr: Mode de fixation du bouton: Vêtements; Vêtements pour bébés et enfants; Artisanat et décoration; Fabrication de poupées; Tricots; Vêtements d’extérieur et manteaux; Scrapbooking et carterie; Uniformes; Tapisserie d’ameublement; Tenues de mariage et de cérémonie; Autre
zh-TW: 按鈕應用: 服飾; 嬰幼兒服飾; 手工藝與裝飾; 玩偶製作; 針織衫; 外套與大衣; 剪貼簿與卡片製作; 制服; 傢飾布; 婚紗與正式服裝; 其他